Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB114.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Independent Energy Office Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." As follows:(1) A department, departmental administrative board or commission, independent board or commission, agency or other authority of this Commonwealth in existence on the effective date of this definition or created on or after the effective date of this definition.(2) The term does not include:123456789101112131415161718 (i) The Senate or House of Representatives.(ii) A court.(iii) A political subdivision.(iv) A municipal or local authority."Office." The Independent Energy Office established under section 3(a).Section 3. Independent Energy Office.(a) Establishment.--The Independent Energy Office is established within the Independent Regulatory Review Commission. (b) Energy Advocate.--The office shall consist of a director to be known as the Energy Advocate. The Energy Advocate:(1) Shall be appointed by the Consumer Advocate and be confirmed by the Senate.(2) Shall serve for a term of five years.(3) May hire staff to fulfill the office's duties, subject to appropriations by the General Assembly.Section 4. Powers and duties.The office shall:(1) Be charged with protecting the reliability and affordability of the electricity grid within this Commonwealth and promoting the use of energy produced in this Commonwealth.(2) Evaluate regulations, policies, documents and actions of an agency for the purpose of determining whether the actions may harm energy reliability and affordability within this Commonwealth.(3) Notify an agency which takes an action that the office determines may harm energy reliability and affordability within this Commonwealth and request that the agency reverse the action. If the agency does not reverse the 20250HB0114PN0092 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 action to the satisfaction of the office, the office may reverse or block the action of the agency.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0114PN0092 - 3 - 1234